Arkansas, session 2025, SB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-237. Participation of private school students in interscholastic
activities at public schools — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Athletic activity” means a varsity sport or another
competitive sports-related contest, game, event, or exhibition that involves
an individual student or teams of students either among schools within a
resident school district or between schools outside of the resident school
district;
(2) “Interscholastic activity” means an activity between schools
subject to rules of the Arkansas Activities Association that is:
*TNL210*
03-06-2025 14:13:48 TNL210

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 SB303
(A) Outside the regular curriculum of a public school
district, including without limitation an athletic activity, a fine arts
program, or a special interest club or group; and
(B) Taught by an individual with a minimum of a high
school diploma;
(3) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to a child;
(4) "Private school" means a nonpublic elementary or secondary
school that is:
(A) A registered nonprofit; and
(B) Accredited or licensed by an accrediting association
recognized by the State Board of Education;
(5) "Resident school" means:
(A) A public school to which a student would be assigned
by the student's resident school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school with a campus
located within the student's resident school district; and
(6) “Resident school district” means a public school district in
which a private school student's parent resides as determined under § 6-18-
202.
(b) A resident school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school may permit a private school student to pursue participation in an
interscholastic activity at the resident school if the private school in
which the student is enrolled does not have the interscholastic activity in
which the private school student seeks to participate approved by the
Arkansas Activities Association.
(c) A private school student who participates in an interscholastic
activity that does not occur during a designated class period at his or her
resident school shall be enrolled in a nonacademic class period in his or her
resident school that coincides with the interscholastic activity that does
not occur during a designated class period in which the private school
student participates in order for the resident school district to receive an
amount equal to one-sixth (1/6) of the state foundation funding amount
provided under § 6-20-2305 for the duration of the private school student's
enrollment in the resident school district.

03-06-2025 14:13:48 TNL210

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 SB303
/s/Dees



































03-06-2025 14:13:48 TNL210